Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-32] State and county contributions;
active employees. (a) The State, through the department of budget and
finance, and the counties, through their respective departments of finance,
shall pay to the fund a monthly contribution equal to the amount established
under chapter 89C or specified in the applicable public sector collective
bargaining agreements, whichever is appropriate, for each of their respective
employee-beneficiaries and employee-beneficiaries with dependent-beneficiaries,
which shall be used toward the payment of costs of a health benefits plan;
provided that:

(1) The monthly contribution shall be a specified
dollar amount;

(2) The monthly contribution shall not exceed the
actual cost of a health benefits plan;

(3) If both husband and wife are
employee-beneficiaries, the total contribution by the State or the county shall
not exceed the monthly contribution for a family plan; and

(4) If the State or any of the counties establish
cafeteria plans in accordance with Title 26, United States Code section 125,
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and section 78-30, the monthly
contribution for those employee-beneficiaries who participate in a cafeteria
plan shall be made through the cafeteria plan, and the payments made by the State
or counties shall include their respective contributions to the fund and their
employee-beneficiary's share of the cost of the employee-beneficiary's health
benefits plan.

(b) The State, through the department of
budget and finance, and the counties, through their respective departments of
finance, shall pay to the fund a monthly contribution equal to the amount
established under chapter 89C or specified in the applicable public sector
collective bargaining agreement, whichever is applicable, for each of their
respective employees, to be used toward the payment of group life insurance
benefits for each employee. [L 2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Revision Note

In subsection (a)(4), reference to "section 78-30"
substituted for "part II of chapter 78".

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next